Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 5. RAILROADS

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 81. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 81.001. DEFINITIONS. In this title:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Transportation Commission.

(2) "Department" means the Texas Department of Transportation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 1540), Sec. 2.02, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 81.002. APPLICABILITY. In this title, a reference to a railroad company includes:

(1) a railroad incorporated before September 1, 2007, under former Title 112, Revised Statutes; or

(2) any other legal entity operating a railroad, including an entity organized under the Texas Business Corporation Act or the Texas Corporation Law provisions of the Business Organizations Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 1540), Sec. 2.02, eff. April 1, 2011.